Utah statutes.
53A-2-119.   Reapportionment -- Local school board membership.
(1)  Upon the creation of a new school district, the county legislative body
shall reapportion the affected school districts pursuant to Section
20A-14-201.
(2)  Except as provided in Section 53A-2-118.1, school board membership in the
affected school districts shall be determined under Title 20A, Chapter 14,
Part 2, Nomination and Election of Members of Local Boards of Education.
